Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6253.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 36-9-31 of the General Laws in Chapter 36-9 entitled "Retirement
System — Membership and Service Credits" is hereby amended to read as follows:
36-9-31. Armed service credit.
(a) Any active member of the retirement system, who served on active duty in the armed
service of the United States or in the Merchant Marine service of the United States as defined in
P.L. 1946, ch. 1721, § 2 may purchase credit for that service up to a maximum of four (4) years
provided that he or she has received an honorable discharge. Provided further that any employee
on an official leave of absence for illness or injury shall be eligible to purchase military credits as
defined herein while on the leave of absence.
(b) Members of the retirement system who are police officers or firefighters, and who
served in the national guard or reserves, and qualify as veterans, may purchase creditable service
at a ratio of five (5) years of guard or reserve service to one year of creditable service, up to a
maximum of four (4) years; provided that, they have received an honorable discharge. Provided
further, that any police officer or firefighter on an official leave of absence for illness or injury shall
be eligible to purchase military credits as defined in this section while on their leave of absence.
(b)(c) The cost to purchase these credits shall be ten percent (10%) of the member’s first
year’s earnings as a state employee as defined in chapter 9 of this title, multiplied by the number
of years and fraction thereof of the armed service or Merchant Marine service up to a maximum of

four (4) years.
(c)(d) There will be no interest charge provided the member makes that purchase during
his or her first five (5) years of membership in the retirement system, but will be charged regular
interest to date of purchase from date of enrollment into membership if purchased after completing
five (5) years of membership; provided, however, any member who was in the retirement system
prior to July 1, 1980, would not be charged interest whenever he or she purchases the armed
services credit.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002666
========
LC002666 - Page 2 of 3